Illinois, session 104th, HB3140.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Care 5for Retired Police Dogs Program Act. 6    Section 5. General Assembly findings. The General Assembly 7finds that:8        (1) police dogs are an integral part of many law 9    enforcement and correctional efforts statewide, including 10    the apprehension of suspects through tracking and 11    searching, evidence location, drug and bomb detection, and 12    search and rescue operations;13        (2) law enforcement and correctional agencies agree 14    that the use of police dogs is an extremely cost-effective 15    means of crime control and that police dogs possess skills 16    and abilities that frequently exceed those of existing 17    technology;18        (3) the service of police dogs is often dangerous and 19    can expose them to injury at a rate higher than that of 20    non-service dogs; and21        (4) police dogs provide significant contributions to 22    the residents of this State.    HB3140 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 04147 RTM 14171 b1    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act: 2    "Correctional agency" means a lawfully established State 3or local public agency having primary responsibility for the 4supervision, protection, care, custody, control, or 5investigation of inmates at a correctional institution.6    "Law enforcement agency" means a lawfully established 7State or local public agency having primary responsibility for 8the prevention and detection of crime or the enforcement of 9penal, traffic, highway, regulatory, gaming, immigration, 10postal, customs, or controlled substances laws.11    "Retired police dog" means a dog that was previously in 12the service of or employed by a law enforcement agency or a 13correctional agency in this State for the principal purpose of 14aiding in the detection of criminal activity, enforcement of 15laws, or apprehension of offenders and that received 16certification in obedience and apprehension work from a 17certifying organization, such as the National Police Canine 18Association or a similar certifying organization.19    "Veterinarian" has the same meaning given to that term in 20the Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act of 2004. 21    "Veterinary care" means the practice, by a veterinarian, 22of veterinary medicine as defined in Section 3 of the 23Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act of 2004. The term 24includes annual wellness examinations, vaccinations, internal 25and external parasite prevention treatments, testing and 26treatment of illnesses and diseases, medications, emergency   HB3140 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 04147 RTM 14171 b1care and surgeries, veterinary oncology or other specialty 2care, euthanasia, and cremation. 3    Section 15. Establishment of program. The Care for Retired 4Police Dogs Program is created within the University of 5Illinois system to provide a stable funding source for the 6veterinary care of retired police dogs.  7    Section 20. Administration. The Board of Trustees of the 8University of Illinois shall contract with a not-for-profit 9corporation organized under Article 2 of the General Not For 10Profit Corporation Act of 1986 to administer and manage the 11Care for Retired Police Dogs Program. The Board of Trustees of 12the University of Illinois shall select the not-for-profit 13corporation through a competitive grant award process. The 14not-for-profit corporation must meet all of the following 15criteria:16        (1) It must be dedicated to the protection or care of 17    retired police dogs.18        (2) It must be exempt from taxation under Section 19    501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code as an organization 20    described in Section 501(c)(3) of that Code.21        (3) It must have maintained such tax-exempt status for 22    at least 5 years.23        (4) It must agree to be subject to review and audit at 24    the discretion of the Auditor General in order to ensure   HB3140 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 04147 RTM 14171 b1    accurate accounting and disbursement of State funds.2        (5) It must demonstrate the ability to effectively and 3    efficiently disseminate information and to assist former 4    handlers and adopters of retired police dogs in complying 5    with this Act.  6    Section 25. Funding.7    (a) Subject to appropriations made by the General Assembly 8from the Illinois Police K-9 Memorial Fund to the University 9of Illinois for implementation of this Act, the Board of 10Trustees of the University of Illinois shall make grants to 11the not-for-profit corporation contracted by the Board of 12Trustees of the University of Illinois under Section 20 to be 13the disbursing authority for the Care for Retired Police Dogs 14Program. These funds must be disbursed to the former handler 15or the adopter of a retired police dog that served for 5 years 16or more as a police dog upon receipt of:17        (1) valid documentation from the law enforcement 18    agency or correctional agency from which the dog retired 19    which verifies that the dog was in the service of or 20    employed by that agency and that the dog served:21            (A) 5 years or more with that agency;22            (B) a total of 5 years or more with 2 or more law 23        enforcement agencies or correctional agencies; or24            (C) 3 years or more with one or more law 25        enforcement agencies or correctional agencies and was   HB3140 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 04147 RTM 14171 b1        injured in the line of duty while serving with a law 2        enforcement agency or correctional agency and retired 3        from the agency the dog was serving with at the time of 4        the injury due to the injury; and5        (2) a valid invoice from a veterinarian for veterinary 6    care provided in this State to a retired police dog and 7    documentation establishing payment of the invoice by the 8    former handler or the adopter of the retired police dog.9    (b) Annual disbursements to a former handler or an adopter 10to reimburse him or her for the cost of the retired police 11dog's veterinary care may not exceed $1,500 per dog. A former 12handler or an adopter of a retired police dog may not 13accumulate unused funds from a current year for use in a future 14year.15    (c) A former handler or an adopter of a retired police dog 16who seeks reimbursement for veterinary care under this Act may 17not receive reimbursement if funds appropriated for the Care 18for Retired Police Dogs Program are depleted in the year for 19which the reimbursement is sought. 20    Section 30. Administrative expenses. The University of 21Illinois shall pay to the not-for-profit corporation 22contracted by the Board of Trustees of the University of 23Illinois under Section 20, and the not-for-profit corporation 24may use, up to 10% of appropriated funds each fiscal year for 25the not-for-profit corporation's administrative expenses,   HB3140 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 04147 RTM 14171 b1including salaries and benefits.  2    Section 90. Rules. The Board of Trustees of the University 3of Illinois shall adopt rules to implement this Act. 4    Section 100. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 3-699.8 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/3-699.8)7    Sec. 3-699.8. Illinois Police K-9 Memorial Plates.8    (a) The Secretary, upon receipt of all applicable fees and 9applications made in the form prescribed by the Secretary, may 10issue special registration plates designated as Illinois 11Police K-9 Memorial license plates. The special plates issued 12under this Section shall be affixed only to passenger vehicles 13of the first division, motorcycles, autocycles, or motor 14vehicles of the second division weighing not more than 8,000 15pounds. Plates issued under this Section shall expire 16according to the multi-year procedure established by Section 173-414.1 of this Code. 18    (b) The design and color of the plates is wholly within the 19discretion of the Secretary. The Secretary may allow the 20plates to be issued as vanity plates or personalized under 21Section 3-405.1 of the Code. Appropriate documentation, as 22determined by the Secretary, shall accompany each application. 23The Secretary shall prescribe stickers or decals as provided   HB3140 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 04147 RTM 14171 b1under Section 3-412 of this Code. 2    (c) An applicant shall be charged a $40 fee for original 3issuance in addition to the applicable registration fee. Of 4this additional fee, $15 shall be deposited into the Secretary 5of State Special License Plate Fund and $25 shall be deposited 6into the Illinois Police K-9 Memorial Fund. For each 7registration renewal period, a $27 fee, in addition to the 8appropriate registration fee, shall be charged. Of this 9additional fee, $2 shall be deposited into the Secretary of 10State Special License Plate Fund and $25 shall be deposited 11into the Illinois Police K-9 Memorial Fund. 12    (d) The Illinois Police K-9 Memorial Fund is created as a 13special fund in the State treasury. All moneys in the Illinois 14Police K-9 Memorial Fund shall be paid, subject to 15appropriation by the General Assembly and distribution by the 16Secretary, as grants to the Northern Illinois Police K-9 17Memorial for the creation, operation, and maintenance of a 18police K-9 memorial monument for grants under the Care for 19Retired Police Dogs Program Act. 20    (e) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (a) of 21Section 3-600, if the Secretary of State has not received 222,000 plate applications to issue the special plate authorized 23under this Section by January 1, 2028, then the Secretary of 24State's authority to issue the special plate is nullified and 25the plate shall not be issued.26    (f) If the Secretary of State has not received 2,000 plate   HB3140 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 04147 RTM 14171 b1applications to issue the special plate authorized under this 2Section by January 1, 2028, then the provisions of this 3Section, other than this subsection (f), are inoperative after 4January 1, 2028. 5(Source: P.A. 103-843, eff. 1-1-25.)